Hawaii statutes.
§802-4 Determination of indigency.
Unless otherwise ordered by the court, the determination of indigency shall be
made by a public defender, subject to review by the court. Such determination
shall be based upon an appropriate inquiry into the financial circumstances of
the person seeking legal representation and an affidavit or a certificate
signed by such person demonstrating the person's financial inability to obtain
legal counsel. A person shall waive the person's right to counsel by refusing
to furnish any information pertinent to the determination of indigency. [L
1971, c 185, pt of §1; HRS §705C-4; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1 and am L 1972, c
44, §1(c); gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Factors to be considered in determination of indigency. 56
H. 23, 525 P.2d 1108 (1974).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next